Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB507.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 199.575 is amended to read as follows:
In situations where a preadoptive brother or sister relationship existed, and one (1) or
more of these siblings was then adopted, the following procedures shall be followed on
an inquiry by one (1) or more of the siblings to the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services seeking information about his or her brother or sister:
(1) In all cases, an adopted person eighteen (18) years of age or older or a preadoptive
sibling eighteen (18) years of age or older of an adopted person may file
information concerning himself or herself, his or her present location, and his or
her known antecedents with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, stating his
or her interest in being reunited with his or her preadoptive siblings and
authorizing the cabinet to release such information to his or her preadoptive
siblings who may make similar inquiry.
(2) In any case in which a person eighteen (18) years of age or older requests
information about or expresses a desire in being reunited with a preadoptive sibling,
the cabinet shall first determine whether such sibling has made similar inquiry
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. If the sibling has previously authorized
release of information about himself or herself, the cabinet shall release the
information to the sibling making inquiry.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/28/2026 1:36 PM Jacketed